North Carolina, session 2025, HB110.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 127A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 19.
"National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program.
"§ 127A-230. National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program.
The National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program is established. The Program shall
provide student loan repayment awards to active members of the North Carolina National Guard
to incentivize the initiation or completion of a term of service with the North Carolina National
Guard. For purposes of this Article, a term of service shall be no shorter than three years in length.
"§ 127A-231. Program administration.
(a) The general supervision and administration of the Program shall be vested in the
North Carolina National Guard Adjutant General. It shall be the duty of the Adjutant General or
the Adjutant General's designee to do each of the following:
(1) Organize and establish rules and regulations for the Program, as necessary.
(2) Direct and control all Program personnel matters.
(3) Oversee and direct the administration and functioning of the Program.
(b) The Program shall include at a minimum each of the following guidelines:
(1) No award recipient shall receive an award exceeding the amount of student
loan debt held by the recipient at the time of the award.
(2) No award recipient shall receive an award exceeding fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) for an initial three-year term of service, except that recipients
serving a term of service exceeding three years in length may receive up to an
additional ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in award monies for each additional
year of service beyond the first three years of service.
(3) Prior to receiving an award from the Program, award recipients shall submit a
signed and notarized agreement to repay to the National Guard Student Loan
Repayment Program Fund award monies for every month of the term of
service the award recipient failed to serve as an active member of the North
Carolina National Guard. Repayment pursuant to the agreement required by
this subdivision shall only apply to an award recipient whose term of service
was terminated (i) voluntarily or (ii) involuntarily due to misconduct. The
repayment amount under this subdivision shall equal the product of the total
*H110-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
number of months of the term of service in which the award recipient failed
to serve as an active member of the North Carolina National Guard, multiplied
by the quotient of the total amount of the award divided by the total number
of months of the term of service. The repayment agreement must contain terms
no less favorable than the award recipient's original loan agreement that was
paid off by the award.
"§ 127A-232. National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program Fund.
(a) The National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program Fund is established as a
nonreverting special revenue fund. The Fund consists of General Fund appropriations, gifts,
donations, grants, devises, fees, and monies contributed by State and non-State entities for the
operation, maintenance, and expansion of the National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program
established by this Article, and any other revenues specifically allocated to the Fund by an act of
the General Assembly.
(b) Revenue credited to the Fund may only be used for costs associated with the
operations, maintenance, and expansion of the National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program
established by this Article."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
National Guard Student Loan Repayment Program Fund the sum of twenty-five million five
hundred forty thousand nine hundred dollars ($25,540,900) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be used pursuant to the guidelines of that Fund.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
National Guard the sum of one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) in recurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to hire at least two full-time communications
professionals.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 110-Second Edition